Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-358
Association, defined.

Association shall mean a savings and loan association, referred to as a building and loan association, or loan and building association, building association, savings and loan association, or loan and savings association, incorporated and now existing under the laws of this state or incorporated under sections 8-356 to 8-384.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 3.